Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.040

Court may permit deviation from terms of trust instrument.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the power of a court of proper jurisdiction to permit a fiduciary to deviate from the terms of any will, agreement, or other instrument relating to the acquisition, investment, reinvestment, exchange, retention, sale, or management of fiduciary property.

[ 1985 c 30 s 71. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.24.040; prior: 1947 c 100 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3255-10d. Formerly RCW 30.24.040.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.